Hawaii statutes.
§346-17.4 Higher education stipends for students. (a) An eligible former foster
youth shall be eligible for a higher education stipend after reaching the age
of majority, and the higher education stipend for that former foster youth
shall be paid to an intermediary contracted by the department, to the former
foster youth, or to the former foster youth's former resource caregivers,
adoptive parents, or legal custodians, as appropriate; provided that:

(1) The former foster youth is twenty-six years old or
younger;

(2) The former foster youth has submitted a completed
application for a higher education stipend six months prior to the youth's
twenty-seventh birthday; and

(3) The former foster youth is attending or has been accepted
to attend an accredited institution of higher education.

(b) The higher education stipend may be issued
and applied to costs incurred while the former foster youth is attending an accredited
institution of higher education on a full-time basis or on a part-time basis, in
accordance with rules adopted by the department.

(c) The duration of the total higher education
stipend shall not exceed a cumulative total of sixty months.

(d) The amount of the higher education stipend
shall be based on the financial support the department provides in accordance
with rules adopted by the department.

(e) The department's standards relating to
income resources of foster children shall be applicable to this section.

(f) Higher education stipends shall be provided
subject to the availability of state and federal funds. [L 1989, c 394, §1; am
L 1990, c 276, §1; am L 1999, c 124, §1; am L 2000, c 79, §1; am L 2001, c 80,
§2; am L 2006, c 289, §3; am L 2008, c 198, §2; am L 2016, c 134, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next